Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority
154.20-180.
Business networks revolving loan fund — Eligibility for assistance — Administration of fund.

Any business firm that is a member of an approved business network comprising individual firms, companies, agricultural business entities, or industrial entities that have been identified as key industries and that have been targeted by the state’s economic development strategic plan as eligible for priority consideration for state assistance shall also be eligible for state assistance under the provisions of this section.

A business networks revolving loan fund shall be established and shall be administered by the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority. The fund shall be maintained and credited with repayments and the fund balance shall be available in perpetuity to provide loans at or below market rates at terms not to exceed thirty (30) years to members of approved business networks to support the development and production of new and expanded products and production facilities, including, but not limited to, financing development and construction of value-added food and fiber production facilities, accelerating modernization of production systems, and making of new technology investments. The maximum amount of loans made available to any member of an approved business network shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total amount of available funds.

The Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority shall cause to be established and implemented fiscal controls and accounting procedures sufficient to assure proper accounting during appropriate accounting periods for payments and disbursements received and made by the fund and for fund balances at the beginning and end of each accounting period.

In addition to powers and authorities otherwise granted the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority, the authority may:

Make and condition loans from the fund as required by state or federal law;

Enter into any necessary or required agreement and give or make any necessary or required assurance or certification with any person or entity to receive payments or to make or to provide loans;

Guarantee or purchase insurance for obligations of the fund where the action would improve credit market access or reduce interest rates;

Receive money from any public or private source to implement the purposes of this section;

Approve or reject applications made to it for loans from the fund, and establish standards applicable thereto;

Provide for the issuance of revenue bonds and bond anticipation notes as prescribed by KRS 154.10-035 for the purposes as set forth in this section;

Promulgate administrative regulations implementing the purposes of this section in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A; and

Do all things necessary and convenient to achieve the objectives and purposes of this section which are not otherwise prohibited by state law.

In carrying out the objectives and purposes of this section, the authority shall consult with the Kentucky Department of Agriculture regarding development of standards and conditions applicable to agribusiness and agriculture related loan applications.

Nothing contained herein shall preclude the authority from contracting with or acquiring services from any state agency or institution regarding implementation of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 390, § 14, effective July 15, 1994.

154.20-190.
Rural hospital operations and facilities revolving loan fund.

As used in this section:

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority; and

“Rural hospital” means any hospital located within a county of the Commonwealth having a population of less than fifty thousand (50,000) according to the most recent annual estimates of the resident population issued by the United States Census Bureau.

The rural hospital operations and facilities revolving loan fund is established for the authority to provide loans to a rural hospital.
(2) (a)

The rural hospital operations and facilities revolving loan fund is established for the authority to provide loans to a rural hospital.

Any loan issued by the authority shall not exceed a twenty (20) year term and shall be utilized by the Cabinet for Economic Development to assist a rural hospital in providing needed direct health care services for the citizens of the Commonwealth by:

Maintaining or upgrading the hospital’s facilities;

Maintaining or increasing the current staff of the rural hospital; or

Providing health care services that are not currently available to citizens.

The Cabinet for Economic Development shall:

Determine the terms and conditions of each loan, including the repayment to be deposited back in the revolving loan fund for issuance of future loans to other rural hospitals;

Monitor the performance of the rural hospital; and

By October 1, 2020, and by each October 1 thereafter, report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue information about each outstanding loan issued, including:

The name and location of the rural hospital;

The amount of principal originally loaned;

The terms of the loan and whether the rural hospital is currently meeting those terms; and

How the rural hospital used the loan related to facilities, staff, or additional services.

The fund created in subsection (2) of this section shall be a trust and agency account.
(4) (a)

The fund created in subsection (2) of this section shall be a trust and agency account.

The Cabinet for Economic Development shall administer the fund.

The fund shall consist of appropriations, contributions, donations, gifts, or federal funds.

Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not lapse.

Moneys deposited in the fund are hereby appropriated for the sole purpose of providing loans to rural hospitals.

HISTORY:
2020 ch. 128, § 1, effective April 24, 2020.